public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
akuar/A
alegrar/A
inamorar/A
ansinar/A
arguir/A
asénter/A
aŧidar/A
inaxenir/A
bagajar/A
bakar/A
balegar/A
xbalotar/A
dexbandir/A
inbaoxar/A
barbotar/A
barufar/A
rebàter/A
dexbaukar/A
xbaxir/A
bekolar/A
bersajar/A
bevaŧar/A
biasugar/A
skonbinar/A
subisar/A
bixigolar/A
xbóɉer/A
xbokolar/A
xbolŧar/A
bondar/A
xbordelar/A
inboskaɉar/A
aboŧar/A
xbragañar/A
xbranar/A
xbraŧolar/A
inbrijar/A
brojar/A
brokolar/A
brunar/A
xbuelar/A
inbusolar/A
buxinar/A
incapetar/A
cefar/A
koncèñer/A
mancéñer/A
cikar/A
scokiđar/A
redir/A
indebolir/A
indeñar/A
dexertar/A
díxer/A
dokumentar/A
redomandar/A
stradopiar/A
dotar/A
dubitar/A
tradúxer/A
đogar/A
ađornar/A
èser/A
ensir/A
adeskar/A
exeguir/A
desfar/A
fabregar/A
falar/A
desfamar/A
faoređar/A
faturar/A
scarifegar/A
ratifegar/A
fenir/A
aferir/A
fermar/A
arfiar/A
fiankonar/A
afidar/A
rafigurar/A
filtrar/A
fiolar/A
desfisir/A
desfiubar/A
fofar/A
desfoɉar/A
sfondrar/A
desformar/A
desfornir/A
fosinar/A
frantumar/A
fraskeđar/A
parafraxar/A
rinfreskar/A
infrixar/A
sfruñar/A
fulmenar/A
furfar/A
ingabanar/A
dexgaletar/A
xganbarar/A
garbar/A
xgargatar/A
ingateɉar/A
xginŧar/A
ingoloxir/A
dexgorgar/A
retrogradir/A
xgranar/A
dexgrankir/A
gravar/A
ingređar/A
dexgreŧiar/A
gritar/A
grongolar/A
ingrumar/A
guadañar/A
guañar/A
xgusar/A
ilunar/A
infestar/A
inondar/A
inritar/A
intivar/A
iritar/A
joŧolar/A
ɉegomarar/A
dexɉonfar/A
dexɉustar/A
deskaenar/A
inkalir/A
kalkar/A
kalpestar/A
inkamixar/A
skanelar/A
deskankarar/A
skansar/A
kañar/A
deskapitar/A
skapuŧar/A
kargar/A
skarnevalar/A
skartabelar/A
skasar/A
inkastronar/A
deskatiɉar/A
prokaŧar/A
skavar/A
inkaxar/A
koar/A
akòjer/A
deskokonar/A
deskolorir/A
skomenŧar/A
skonir/A
konfutar/A
deskonpañar/A
konsumar/A
inkontrar/A
konxeturar/A
konkórer/A
kordar/A
inkorđar/A
skoroŧar/A
skosar/A
inkoŧar/A
koxinar/A
rinkréser/A
kritegar/A
skrostar/A
krupoliđar/A
kuaɉar/A
interkuerar/A
inkuirar/A
rinkular/A
rekuperar/A
kuŧolar/A
lagremar/A
lanpiđar/A
xlargar/A
dexlaŧar/A
inleamar/A
legrar/A
deletar/A
xlexerir/A
xlièđer/A
xlimegar/A
xliŧegar/A
dexlogar/A
lordar/A
xludrar/A
lustrar/A
xmacar/A
xmagrar/A
xmaliŧiar/A
remandar/A
manifestar/A
mañatar/A
remarkar/A
martelar/A
mascar/A
xmaskerar/A
dexmaŧar/A
maxegar/A
strameđar/A
demenar/A
dementir/A
xmerdar/A
desprométer/A
reméter/A
emigrar/A
xminuir/A
mobiliar/A
mokaɉar/A
moltonar/A
remontar/A
demoraliđar/A
demòrder/A
tramortir/A
xmoŧar/A
inmucar/A
inmufir/A
inmurar/A
mutir/A
inmuxonar/A
naspar/A
negar/A
dexnetar/A
noar/A
denonŧiar/A
xnuar/A
iñarar/A
oceđar/A
inoɉar/A
omologar/A
ondiđar/A
orbar/A
orđar/A
abortir/A
ostregar/A
spacaŧar/A
repagar/A
despaketar/A
spaletar/A
palpierar/A
pànder/A
spantađar/A
aparir/A
sparir/A
inparonir/A
parteŧipar/A
sorpasar/A
pastiđar/A
inpatar/A
despaŧar/A
inpaverar/A
arpegar/A
spelar/A
spelumar/A
spénder/A
penolar/A
spentonar/A
perdonar/A
inperletar/A
pestegar/A
peteđar/A
spetorar/A
inpeverar/A
repiantar/A
piàxer/A
pikar/A
pindolar/A
inpionbar/A
pirolar/A
pistoletar/A
inpiŧolar/A
suplegar/A
inpolmonar/A
polveriđar/A
dispóner/A
skonpóner/A
ponsar/A
apontelar/A
trapónxer/A
reportar/A
postar/A
ipotegar/A
precixar/A
presar/A
apreŧiar/A
prinŧipiar/A
apropiar/A
despuleđar/A
spuŧar/A
ràder/A
xraixar/A
rantegar/A
recar/A
arénder/A
rigar/A
rodolar/A
romatiđar/A
rotamar/A
rular/A
saetar/A
salivar/A
insanguenar/A
saxonar/A
sedolar/A
insèguer/A
deseleđar/A
resentir/A
oservar/A
siar/A
sincerar/A
skalfurar/A
iskarselar/A
skitar/A
skrinŧar/A
sofistegar/A
resòlver/A
sorbetar/A
sparpañar/A
insperonar/A
spinfarar/A
isporkar/A
stabilir/A
stanpelar/A
stikar/A
stivalar/A
stranir/A
destrikar/A
stuar/A
subiar/A
supiar/A
intajar/A
tanajar/A
intardegar/A
tavelar/A
preinténder/A
tentar/A
manteñir/A
detéñer/A
interŧar/A
tirar/A
coler/A
intorbir/A
intòrđer/A
sotràer/A
stranŧir/A
travaɉar/A
stridar/A
tronkar/A
turbinar/A
ŧéder/A
inŧercar/A
deŧíder/A
inŧipriar/A
inŧukarar/A
abuxar/A
valutar/A
varkar/A
sorvejar/A
redeventar/A
reveñir/A
verdeđar/A
konversar/A
reinvestir/A
xvimenar/A
viŧinar/A
revokar/A
deskonvòlxer/A
xàser/A
xdrumenar/A
dexiderar/A
xmorgolar/A
